North Carolina statutes. Chapter 87. Contractors.
Article 8. Underground Damage Prevention. [Repealed]

§§ 87-100 through 87-114.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014, and applicable to all activities regulated by the provisions of Article 8A of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, as enacted by Session Laws 2013-407, s. 2, that occur on or after that date.

History.

G.S. 87-100

; 1985, c. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-101; 1985, c. 785, s. 1; 2013-142, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-102; 1985, c. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-103; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1; effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-104; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-105; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-106; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-107; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-107.1; 2103-142, s. 2; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-108; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-109; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-110; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; 2012-18, s. 1.15; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-111; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-112; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-113; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014. G.S. 87-114; 1985, ch. 785, s. 1; repealed by 2013-407, s. 1, effective October 1, 2014.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions pertaining to the Underground Utility Safety and Damage Prevention Act, see

G.S. 87-115

, et seq.